Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.490

State employee return-to-work program.

In addition to the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.150, the director shall adopt rules establishing a state employee return-to-work program. The program shall, at a minimum:

(1) Direct each agency to adopt a return-to-work policy. The program shall allow each agency program to take into consideration the special nature of employment in the agency;

(2) Provide for eligibility in the return-to-work program, for a minimum of two years from the date the temporary disability commenced, for any permanent employee who is receiving compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and who is, by reason of his or her temporary disability, unable to return to his or her previous work, but who is physically capable of carrying out work of a lighter or modified nature;

(3) Require each agency to name an agency representative responsible for coordinating the return-to-work program of the agency;

(4) Provide that applicants receiving appointments for classified service receive an explanation of the return-to-work policy;

(5) Require training of supervisors on implementation of the return-to-work policy, including but not limited to assessment of the appropriateness of the return-to-work job for the employee; and

(6) Coordinate participation of applicable employee assistance programs, as appropriate.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 427; 2002 c 354 s 223; 1990 c 204 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Findings—Purpose—1990 c 204: See note following RCW 51.44.170.